Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-23] Vacating award. (a) Upon
motion to the court by a party to an arbitration proceeding, the court shall
vacate an award made in the arbitration proceeding if:

(1) The award was procured by corruption, fraud, or
other undue means;

(2) There was:

(A) Evident partiality by an arbitrator
appointed as a neutral arbitrator;

(B) Corruption by an arbitrator; or

(C) Misconduct by an arbitrator prejudicing
the rights of a party to the arbitration proceeding;

(3) An arbitrator refused to postpone the hearing
upon showing of sufficient cause for postponement, refused to consider evidence
material to the controversy, or otherwise conducted the hearing contrary to
section 658A-15, so as to prejudice substantially the rights of a party to the
arbitration proceeding;

(4) An arbitrator exceeded the arbitrator's powers;

(5) There was no agreement to arbitrate, unless the
person participated in the arbitration proceeding without raising the objection
under section 658A-15(c) not later than the beginning of the arbitration
hearing; or

(6) The arbitration was conducted without proper
notice of the initiation of an arbitration as required in section 658A-9 so as
to prejudice substantially the rights of a party to the arbitration proceeding.

(b) A motion under this section shall be filed
within ninety days after the movant receives notice of the award pursuant to
section 658A-19 or within ninety days after the movant receives notice of a
modified or corrected award pursuant to section 658A-20, unless the movant
alleges that the award was procured by corruption, fraud, or other undue means,
in which case the motion shall be made within ninety days after the ground is
known or by the exercise of reasonable care would have been known by the
movant.

(c) If the court vacates an award on a ground
other than that set forth in subsection (a)(5), it may order a rehearing. If
the award is vacated on a ground stated in subsection (a)(1) or (2), the
rehearing shall be before a new arbitrator. If the award is vacated on a
ground stated in subsection (a)(3), (4), or (6), the rehearing may be before
the arbitrator who made the award or the arbitrator's successor. The
arbitrator shall render the decision in the rehearing within the same time as
that provided in section 658A-19(b) for an award.

(d) If the court denies a motion to vacate an
award, it shall confirm the award unless a motion to modify or correct the
award is pending. [L 2001, c 265, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Plaintiff contended that district court erred in granting
defendant's motion to confirm and denying plaintiff's motion to vacate the
arbitration award because the arbitrator was biased against plaintiff and
failed to follow the law; confirmation of the arbitration award and denial of
the motion to vacate the award, affirmed. 603 F.3d 676 (2010).

In the narrow circumstances of the case, perjury may
constitute a basis for vacating an arbitration award. 126 H. 99 (App.), 267
P.3d 683 (2011).

Where defendant failed to allege or establish that the
arbitration award itself--i.e., awarding damages in favor of plaintiff--violated
any public policy, and alleged that the arbitrator's findings and conclusions
were tainted by plaintiff's perjury, the statutory grounds embodied in
subsection (a) provided sufficient recourse to vacate awards for fraud,
including perjury, and the public policy exception was inapplicable to the
case. 126 H. 99 (App.), 267 P.3d 683 (2011).

Section provides authority for relief from an arbitration
award, but not from a final judgment on an order confirming an arbitration
award. 131 H. 301 (App.), 318 P.3d 591 (2013).

The arbitrator was expressly authorized by the collective
bargaining agreement to award "back pay to compensate the teacher wholly
... for any salary lost" and interpreted the provision to allow interest
for the time that the teacher was without pay. Even if the arbitrator
incorrectly construed the agreement or misinterpreted applicable law, the
arbitrator acted within the arbitrator's power to interpret the agreement and
fashion a remedy in accordance with the arbitrator's interpretation. 131 H.
301 (App.), 318 P.3d 591 (2013).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next